test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-aeqbtw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - äʼbţõ: # Verb 54 'eng /est aidata/fin' - full paradigm
     äʼbţõ+V+Inf: [äʼbţõ, äbţõ]
     äʼbţõ+V+Ger: [äʼbţõs, äbţõs]
     äʼbţõ+V+Sup: [äʼbţõm, äbţõm]
     äʼbţõ+V+Sup+Ine: [äʼbţõmõs, äbţõmõs]
     äʼbţõ+V+Sup+Ela: [äʼbţõmõst, äbţõmõst]
     äʼbţõ+V+Sup+Tra: [äʼbţõmõks, äbţõmõks]
     äʼbţõ+V+Sup+Abe: [äʼbţõmõt, äbţõmõt]
     äʼbţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: [äʼbţõb, äbţõb]
     äʼbţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [äʼbţõt, äbţõt]
     äʼbţõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [äʼbţõbõd, äbţõbõd]
     äʼbţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [äʼbţiz, äbţiz]
     äʼbţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [[äʼbţizt, äʼbţiztõ], [äbţizt, äʼbţiztõ]]
     äʼbţõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [[äʼbţizt, äʼbţiztõ], [äbţizt, äʼbţiztõ]]
     äʼbţõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: [äʼbţ, äbţ]
     äʼbţõ+V+Cond+Sg3: [äʼbţõks, äbţõks]
     äʼbţõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: [äʼbţ, äbţ]
     äʼbţõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: [äʼbţ, äbţ]
     äʼbţõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: [äʼbţõgid, äbţõgid]
     äʼbţõ+V+Jus+Sg3: [äʼbţõg, äbţõg]
     äʼbţõ+V+Quo+Sg3: [äʼbţiji, äbţiji]
     äʼbţõ+V+ActPrfPrc: [äʼbţõn, äbţõn]
     äʼbţõ+V+PssPrfPrc: [äʼbţõd, äbţõd]
